turmorph.twol
!! List of people who will hate this file:
!!     1. Firespeaker

Alphabet

 A B C Ç D E F G Ğ H I İ J K L M N O Ö P Q R S Ş T U Ü V W X Y Z 
 a b c ç d e f g ğ h ı i j k l m n o ö p q r s ş t u ü v w x y z 

 %{k%}:k  %{p%}:p  %{D%}:d %{K%}:k %{t%}:t %{c%}:ç %{LN%}:l %{e%}:e %{a%}:a
 %{bN%}:0 %{bY%}:0 %{bI%}:0 %{bS%}:0
 %{A%}:a  %{I%}:ı
 %{dup%}:0 %{del%}:0 %{dels%}:0 %{compn%}:0
 %{pA%}:a %{pU%}:u %{pO%}:o
 %{nin%}:0 %{nın%}:0 %{nun%}:0 %{un%}:0 %{in%}:0

 %>:0

 %' % ;


Sets

FrontVow = İ Ü E Ö 
           i ü e ö 
           %{nin%}; 

FrontVowNotUe = İ E Ö
                i e ö 
               %{nin%} ;

BackVowNotUO = I A 
          ı a ; 

BackVow = I U A O 
          ı u a o 
         %{nun%} %{nın%} %{un%}; 

Vow = İ Ü E Ö I U A O
      i ü e ö ı u a o
      %{A%} %{I%} %{bI%} ;


Cns = B C Ç D F G Ğ H J K L M N P Q R S Ş T V W X Y Z 
      b c ç d f g ğ h j k l m n p q r s ş t v w x y z 
      %{k%} %{p%} %{t%} %{D%} %{bN%} %{bY%} %' ;

UnvoicedCns = F Ş T K Ç P
              f ş t k ç p  ;

Rules 

"A Vowel Harmony"
%{A%}:e <=> [ :FrontVow :Cns* ]/[ %>: | %  | :0 | :i | :u ] _ ;
            except
                    %>: m _ %>: %{bI%}: ; 

"I Vowel Harmony (not ü)"
%{I%}:i <=> [ [ :i | :e ] :Cns* ]/[ %>: | % | :0 ] _ ;

"I Vowel Harmony (back 'u')"
%{I%}:u <=> [ [ %{un%}: | :o | :u ] :Cns* ]/[ %>: | % | :0 ] _ ;

"I Vowel Harmony (front 'ü')"
%{I%}:ü <=> [ [ :ö | :ü ] :Cns* ]/[ %>: | % | :0 ] _ ;

"Not 'buffer' N"
%{bN%}:n <=> [ :Vow | :Vow %' ]/[ %>: | % | :0 ] _ ; 
          except 
             [ %{in%}: | %{un%}: ] %' %>: _ ;

"Not 'buffer' {bI} Back (ı)"
%{bI%}:ı <=> [ :a :Cns* :Cns ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ; 
             [ :ı :Cns* :Cns ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ; 

"Not 'buffer' I Back (u)"
%{bI%}:u <=> [ :u :Cns* :Cns ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ; 
             [ :o :Cns* :Cns ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ; 

"Not 'buffer' I Front (i)"
%{bI%}:i <=> [ :i :Cns* :Cns ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ; 
             [ :e :Cns* :Cns ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ; 

"Not 'buffer' I Front (ü)"
%{bI%}:ü <=> [ :ü :Cns* :Cns ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ; 
             [ :ö :Cns* :Cns ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ; 

"Not 'buffer' Y"
%{bY%}:y <=> [ :Vow ]/[ %>: | :0 | :%' ] _ ; 

"Not 'buffer' S"
%{bS%}:s <=>  [ :Vow ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;

"Final stop devoicing"
Vx:Vy <=> _ %>: [ :Vow | %{bN%}:0 :Vow | %{bY%}:0 :Vow | %{bS%}:0 :Vow ] ;
         where Vx         in ( %{p%} %{t%} %{c%} )
               Vy         in (   b     d     c   )
               matched ; 

"{k} devoicing"
%{k%}:ğ <=>  _ %>: [ :Vow | %{bN%}:0 :Vow | %{bY%}:0 :Vow | %{bS%}:0 :Vow ] ;
            except
                   :n _ %>: [ :Vow | %{bN%}:0 :Vow | %{bY%}:0 :Vow | %{bS%}:0 :Vow ] ; 

"{k} devoicing after n"
%{k%}:g <=>  :n  _ %>: [ :Vow | %{bN%}:0 :Vow | %{bY%}:0 :Vow | %{bS%}:0 :Vow ] ;

!  p ->  b : şarap -> şarabı 
!  ç ->  c : ağaç -> ağacı
!  k ->  ğ : bebek -> bebeği
! nk -> ng : renk -> rengi
!  t ->  d : tat  -> tadı

"d devoicing in ablative and locative"
%{D%}:t <=> [ %{k%}:k | %{t%}:t | %{p%}:p | UnvoicedCns ] %>: _ ;
            %{t%}: %>: _ %{I%}: r ;

"Exception for endings in -{t}"
%{t%}:0 <=> _ %>: %{D%}: %{I%}: r ; 

"l/n alternation in passive"
%{LN%}:n <=> [ :Vow | :l ]  %>: _ ;
             [ :Vow | :l ]  %>: %{bI%}: _ ; 
             [ %{e%}: | :Vow | :l ]  %>: %{bI%}:i _ ; 

! If stem ends with *a vowel or `l'* {LN} becomes `n'.
! Otherwise it is `l'.

"Exception for verbs de- and ye-"
%{e%}:0 <=> .#. [ d | y ] _ %>:  %{bI%}:  ;
            [ Vow | Cns ]* _ %>: %{bI%}: y o r ; 
          except
            .#. [ d | y ] _ %>: %{bI%}: %{LN%}: ;

"Exception for verbs ending in -a"
%{a%}:0 <=>  _ %>: %{bI%}: y o r  ;

"Exception for verbs de- and ye- (2)"
%{e%}:i <=> .#. [ d | y ] _ %>:  %{bY%}: :e  ;

"Buffer lol"
%{bI%}:i <=> .#. [ d | y ] :0 %>: _  ; 

"{A} deletion from negative before aorist"
%{A%}:0 <=> %>: m _ %>: %{bI%}: ; 
